Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3209
Corporate trustee;
retirement or pension funds of governmental employees; investments authorized.

(1) Corporate trustees authorized by Nebraska law to exercise
fiduciary powers and holding retirement or pension funds for the benefit of
employees or former employees of cities, villages, school districts, or
other governmental or political subdivisions may invest and reinvest such
funds in such securities and investments as are authorized for trustees, guardians,
conservators, personal representatives, or administrators under the laws of
Nebraska. Retirement or pension funds of such cities, villages, districts,
or subdivisions may be invested in annuities issued by life insurance companies
authorized to do business in Nebraska. Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, any other retirement or pension funds of cities, including
cities operating under home rule charters, villages, school districts except
as provided in section 79-9,107, and all other governmental or political subdivisions
may be invested and reinvested, as the governing body of such city, village,
school district, or other governmental or political subdivision may determine,
in the following classes of securities and investments: (a) Bonds, notes,
or other obligations of the United States or those guaranteed by or for which
the credit of the United States is pledged for the payment of the principal
and interest or dividends thereof; (b) bonds or other evidences of indebtedness
of the State of Nebraska and full faith and credit obligations of or obligations
unconditionally guaranteed as to principal and interest by any other state
of the United States; (c) bonds, notes, or obligations of any municipal or
political subdivision of the State of Nebraska which are general obligations
of the issuer thereof and revenue bonds or debentures of any city, county,
or utility district of this state when the earnings available for debt service
have, for a five-year period immediately preceding the date of purchase, averaged
not less than one and one-half times such debt service requirements; (d) bonds
and debentures issued either singly or collectively by any of the twelve federal
land banks, the twelve intermediate credit banks, or the thirteen banks for
cooperatives under the supervision of the Farm Credit Administration; (e)
certificates of deposit of banks which are members of the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation or capital stock financial institutions, and if the
amount deposited exceeds the amount of insurance available thereon, then the
excess shall be secured in the same manner as for the deposit of public funds;
(f) accounts with building and loan associations, qualifying mutual financial
institutions, or federal savings and loan associations in the State of Nebraska
to the extent that such accounts are insured or guaranteed by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation; (g) bonds or other interest-bearing obligations
of any corporation organized under the laws of the United States or any state
thereof if (i) at the time the purchase is made, they are given, by at least
one statistical organization whose publication is in general use, one of the
three highest ratings given by such organization and (ii) not more than five
percent of the fund shall be invested in the obligations of any one issuer;
(h) direct short-term obligations, generally classified as commercial paper,
of any corporation organized or existing under the laws of the United States
or any state thereof with a net worth of ten million dollars or more; and
(i) preferred or common stock of any corporation organized under the laws
of the United States or of any state thereof with a net worth of ten million
dollars or more if (i) not more than fifty percent of the total investments
at the time such investment is made is in this class and not more than five
percent is invested in each of the first five years and (ii) not more than
five percent thereof is invested in the securities of any one corporation.
Notwithstanding the percentage limits stated in this subsection, the cash
proceeds of the sale of such preferred or common stock may be reinvested in
any securities authorized under this subdivision. No city, village, school
district, or
other governmental subdivision or the governing body thereof shall be authorized
to sell any securities short, buy on margin, or buy, sell, or engage in puts
and calls. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial
institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual
financial institutions.

(2) Notwithstanding the limitations prescribed in subsection
(1) of this section, trustees or
custodians holding retirement or pension funds for the benefit
of employees or former employees of any city
of the primary class, city of the metropolitan class, metropolitan
utilities district, county
in which a city of the metropolitan class is located, or public power district shall invest such
funds in investments of the nature which individuals of prudence, discretion,
and intelligence acquire or retain in dealing with the property of another.
Such investments shall not be made for speculation but for investment, considering
the probable safety of their capital as well as the probable income to be
derived. The trustees or custodians shall
not buy on margin, buy call options, or buy put options. The trustees or custodians may lend any
security if cash, United States Government obligations, or United States Government
agency obligations with a market value equal to or exceeding the market value
of the security lent are received as collateral. If shares of stock are purchased
under this subsection, all proxies may be voted by the trustees or custodians. The asset
allocation restrictions set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall
not be applicable to the funds of pension or retirement systems administered
by or on behalf of a city of
the primary class, city of the metropolitan class, metropolitan
utilities district, county
in which a city of the metropolitan class is located, or public power district.

(3) For purposes
of subsection (2) of this section, a custodian means a custodian meeting the
requirements of section 401(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 1967, c. 257, § 1, p. 678;

Laws 1984, LB 752, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 25;

R.S.Supp.,1989, § 24-601.04;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 21;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1036;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 78;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 29;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 12;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 12;

Laws 2014, LB759, § 18.